Mississippi statutes. Title 13. Evidence, Process and Juries
In General

§ 13-1-1.
Provisions of chapter applicable to all courts.

All provisions contained in this chapter, unless restricted by their nature or by express provision to particular courts, shall apply to and govern all courts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 1810; 1906, § 1987; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1647; 1930, § 1526; 1942, § 1687.

§ 13-1-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 190; 1871, § 756; 1880, § 1599; 1892, § 1738; 1906, § 1915; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1575; 1930, § 1527; 1942, § 1688]

§ 13-1-5.
Competency of husband and wife.

Husbands and wives may be introduced by each other as witnesses in all cases, civil or criminal, and shall be competent witnesses in their own behalf, as against each other, in all controversies between them. Either spouse is a competent witness and may be compelled to testify against the other in any criminal prosecution of either husband or wife for a criminal act against any child, for contributing to the neglect or delinquency of a child, or desertion or nonsupport of children under the age of sixteen (16) years, or abandonment of children. But in all other instances where either of them is a party litigant the other shall not be competent as a witness and shall not be required to answer interrogatories or to make discovery of any matters involved in any such other instances without the consent of both.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 193; 1871, §§ 759, 760; 1880, § 1601; 1892, § 1739; 1906, § 1916; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1576; 1930, § 1528; 1942, § 1689; Laws, 1928, ch. 35; Laws, 1954, ch. 236; Laws, 1978, ch. 395, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§§ 13-1-7. and 13-1-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§13-1-7. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 190; 1871, § 758; 1880, § 1602; 1892, § 1740; 1906, § 1917; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1577; 1930, § 1529; 1942, § 1690; Laws, 1896, p. 107]

§13-1-9. [Codes, 1880, § 1603; 1892, § 1741; 1906, § 1918; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1578; 1930, § 1530; 1942, § 1691; Laws, 1882, p. 109]

§ 13-1-11.
Conviction, except for perjury or subornation of perjury, as no disqualification.

A conviction of a person for any offense, except perjury or subornation of perjury, shall not disqualify such person as a witness, but such conviction may be given in evidence to impeach his credibility. A person convicted of perjury or subornation of perjury shall not afterwards be a competent witness in any case, although pardoned or punished for the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 64, art. 12, title 8 (18); 1857, ch. 61, art. 191; 1871, § 779; 1880, § 1600; 1892, § 1743; 1906, § 1920; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1580; 1930, § 1531; 1942, § 1692.

§ 13-1-13.
Witness may be examined touching interest or convictions.

Any witness may be examined touching his interest in the cause or his conviction of any crime, and his answers may be contradicted, and his interest or his conviction of a crime established by other evidence. A witness shall not be excused from answering any material and relevant question, unless the answer would expose him to criminal prosecution or penalty.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 208; 1871, § 778; 1880, § 1607; 1892, § 1746; 1906, § 1923; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1583; 1930, § 1532; 1942, § 1693.

§ 13-1-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Codes, 1880, § 1604; 1892, § 1742; 1906, § 1919; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1579; 1930, § 1533; 1942, § 1694]

§ 13-1-16.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1984, ch. 414, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§13-1-16. [En Laws, 1972, ch. 338, § 1]

§ 13-1-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 1 (112); 1857, ch. 61, art. 206; 1871, § 776; 1880, § 1605; 1892, § 1744; 1906, § 1921; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1581; 1930, § 1534; 1942, § 1695]

§ 13-1-19.
Witness to be committed for refusal to testify.

If any person subpoenaed as a witness in any case or matter, shall refuse to be sworn or affirmed, or to give evidence, he shall be committed to prison by the court, justice, master, commissioner, referee, or other person authorized to take his testimony, there to remain without bail until he shall be sworn or affirmed or shall give his evidence.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 1 (108); 1857, ch. 61, art. 207; 1871, § 777; 1880, § 1606; 1892, § 1745; 1906, § 1922; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1582; 1930, § 1535; 1942, § 1696.

§ 13-1-21.
Communications privileged; exception.

All communications made to a physician, osteopath, dentist, hospital, nurse, pharmacist, podiatrist, optometrist or chiropractor by a patient under his charge or by one seeking professional advice are hereby declared to be privileged, and such party shall not be required to disclose the same in any legal proceeding except at the instance of the patient or, in case of the death of the patient, at the instance of his personal representative or legal heirs in case there be no personal representative, or except, if the validity of the will of the decedent is in question, at the instance of the personal representative or any of the legal heirs or any contestant or proponent of the will.

Waiver of the medical privilege of patients regarding the release of medical information to health care personnel, the State Board of Health or local health departments, made to comply with Sections 41-3-15, 41-23-1 and 41-23-2 and related rules, shall be implied. The medical privilege likewise shall be waived to allow any physician, osteopath, dentist, hospital, nurse, pharmacist, podiatrist, optometrist or chiropractor to report to the State Department of Health necessary information regarding any person afflicted with any communicable disease or infected with the causative agent thereof who neglects or refuses to comply with accepted protective measures to prevent the transmission of the communicable disease.

Willful violations of the provisions of this section shall constitute a misdemeanor and shall be punishable as provided for by law. Any physician, osteopath, dentist, hospital, nurse, pharmacist, podiatrist, optometrist, or chiropractor shall be civilly liable for damages for any willful or reckless and wanton acts or omissions constituting such violations.

In any action commenced or claim made after July 1, 1983, against a physician, hospital, hospital employee, osteopath, dentist, nurse, pharmacist, podiatrist, optometrist or chiropractor for professional services rendered or which should have been rendered, the delivery of written notice of such claim or the filing of such an action shall constitute a waiver of the medical privilege and any medical information relevant to the allegation upon which the cause of action or claim is based shall be disclosed upon the request of the defendant, or his or her counsel.

In any disciplinary action commencing on or after July 1, 1987, against a medical physician, an osteopathic physician or a podiatrist pursuant to the provisions of Sections 73-25-1 through 73-25-39, 73-25-51 through 73-25-67, 73-25-81 through 73-25-95 and 73-27-1 through 73-27-19, waiver of the medical privilege of a patient to the extent of any information other than that which would identify the patient shall be implied.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3695; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6380; 1930, § 1536; 1942, § 1697; Laws, 1944, ch. 315; Laws, 1968, ch. 441, § 4; Laws, 1976, ch. 347; Laws, 1979, ch. 408; Laws, 1982, ch. 407; Laws, 1983, ch. 327; Laws, 1987, ch. 500, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 557, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 13-1-21.1.
Medical privilege considered waived by and between defendants in medical malpractice suits involving multiple defendants.

In any medical malpractice action with multiple defendants, the medical privilege shall be considered waived by and between all defendants.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 17, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2007.

§ 13-1-22.
Confidentiality of priest-penitent communications.

As used in this section:

A “clergyman” is a minister, priest, rabbi, or other similar functionary of a church, religious organization, or religious denomination.

A communication is “confidential” if made privately and not intended for further disclosure except in furtherance of the purpose of the communication.

A person has a privilege to refuse to disclose and to prevent another from disclosing a confidential communication by the person to a clergyman in his professional character as spiritual adviser.

The privilege may be claimed by the person, by his guardian or conservator, or by his personal representative if he is deceased. The clergyman shall claim the privilege on behalf of the person unless the privilege is waived.

A clergyman’s secretary, stenographer or clerk shall not be examined without the consent of the clergyman concerning any fact, the knowledge of which was acquired in such capacity.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 453, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 13-1-22.1.
Certain communications made to certified peer support member by emergency responder to be privileged; definitions; exception to privilege; penalties.

As used in this section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Certified peer support member” means a law enforcement officer, fireman or emergency medical technician of an emergency service agency or entity who has received training in critical incident stress management and who is certified as a peer support member by the State Board of Health or the Department of Public Safety to provide emotional and moral support to an emergency responder who needs those services as a result of job-related stress or an incident in which the emergency responder was involved while acting in his official capacity.

“Peer support event” means any debriefing, defusing or counseling session conducted by a certified peer support member that involves the emotional or moral support of an emergency responder who needs those services as a result of job-related stress or an incident in which the emergency responder was involved while acting in his official capacity.

A certified peer support member shall not be compelled, without the consent of the emergency responder making the communication, to testify or in any way disclose the contents of any communication made to the certified peer support member by the emergency responder while engaged in a peer support event. This privilege only applies when the communication was made to the certified peer support member during the course of an actual peer support event.

The privilege shall not apply if:

The certified peer support member was an initial emergency service responder, a witness or a party to the incident that prompted the providing of the peer support event to the emergency responder;

A communication reveals the intended commission of a crime or harmful act and such disclosure is determined to be necessary by the certified peer support member to protect any person from a clear, imminent risk of serious mental or physical harm or injury, or to forestall a serious threat to the public safety; or

A crime has been committed and divulged.

Any certified peer support member who reveals the contents of a privileged communication, or any person who threatens, intimidates, or in any way attempts to compel a certified peer support member to disclose the contents of a privileged communication, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 440, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 13-1-23.
Presumption of death.

Any person who shall remain beyond the sea, or absent himself from this state, or conceal himself in this state, for seven years successively without being heard of, shall be presumed to be dead in any case where his death shall come in question, unless proof be made that he was alive within that time. Any property or estate recovered in any such case shall be restored to the person evicted or deprived thereof, if, in a subsequent action, it shall be proved that the person so presumed to be dead is living.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 252; 1871, § 882; 1880, § 1648; 1892, § 1737; 1906, § 1914; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1574; 1930, § 1537; 1942, § 1698.

§ 13-1-25.
Presumptions as to status of military and naval personnel or federal civilian employees.

A written finding of presumed death, made by any officer or employee of the United States authorized to make such finding, pursuant to federal law (5 USC §§ 5561-5568; 37 USC §§ 551-558), as now or hereafter amended, or a duly certified copy of such finding, shall be received in any court, office or other place in this state as prima facie evidence of the death of the person therein found to be dead, and the date, circumstances and place of his disappearance.

An official written report or record, or duly certified copy thereof, that a person is missing, missing in action, interned in a neutral country, or beleaguered, besieged, or captured by an enemy, or is dead, or is alive, made by any officer or employee of the United States authorized by the laws referred to in subsection (1) of this section or by any other law of the United States to make same, shall be received in any court, office or other place in this state as prima facie evidence that such person is missing, missing in action, interned in a neutral country, or beleaguered, besieged, or captured by an enemy, or is dead, or is alive, as the case may be.

For the purposes of subsections (1) and (2) of this section any finding, report or record, or duly certified copy thereof, purporting to have been signed by such an officer or employee of the United States as is described in said subsections shall prima facie be deemed to have been signed and issued by such an officer or employee pursuant to law, and the person signing same shall prima facie be deemed to have acted within the scope of his authority. If a copy purports to have been certified by a person authorized by law to certify the same, such certified copy shall be prima facie evidence of his authority so to certify.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1698-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 353 §§ 1-3.

§§ 13-1-27 through 13-1-75.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1975, ch. 501, § 22, eff from and after January 1, 1976.

§13-1-27. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 1 (113, 114); 1857, ch. 61, art. 209, ch. 62, art. 88; 1871, §§ 788, 1079; 1880, §§ 1608, 1940; 1892, §§ 1747, 1759; 1906, §§ 1924, 1936; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 1584, 1596; 1930, § 1538; 1942, § 1699; Laws, 1948, ch. 231]

§13-1-29. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 50, art. 2 (13); 1857, ch. 58, art. 17; 1871, § 1314; 1880, § 2203; 1892, § 1748; 1906, § 1925; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1585; 1930, § 1552; 1942, § 1713]

§13-1-31. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 210; 1871, § 790; 1880, § 1609; 1892, § 1749; 1906, § 1926; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1586; 1930, § 1539; 1942, § 1700]

§13-1-33. [Codes, 1892, § 1750; 1906, § 1927; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1587; 1930, § 1540; 1942, § 1701; Laws, 1958, ch. 255]

§13-1-35. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 1 (116); 1857, ch. 61, art. 212; 1871, § 791; 1880, § 1611; 1892, § 1751; 1906, § 1928; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1588; 1930, § 1542; 1942, § 1703]

§13-1-37. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 214; 1871, § 793; 1880, § 1613; 1892, § 1753; 1906, § 1930; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1590; 1930, § 1543; 1942, § 1704]

§13-1-39. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 14; 1857, ch. 61, art. 219; 1871, § 798; 1880, § 1618; 1892, § 1757; 1906, § 1934; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1594; 1930, § 1541; 1942, § 1702]

§13-1-41. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art 1 (120); 1857, ch. 61, art. 213; 1871, § 792; 1880, § 1612; 1892, § 1752; 1906, § 1929; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1589; 1930, § 1544; 1942, § 1705]

§13-1-43. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 215; 1871, § 794; 1880, § 1614; 1892, § 1754; 1906, § 1931; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1591; 1930, § 1545; 1942, § 1706]

§13-1-45. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 218; 1871, § 797; 1880, § 1617; 1892, § 1755; 1906, § 1932, Hemingway’s 1917, § 1592; 1930, § 1546; 1942, § 1707]

§13-1-47. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 1 (117); 1857, ch. 61, art. 216; 1871, § 795; 1880, §§ 1615, 1946; 1892, § 1756; 1906, § 1933; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1593; 1930, § 1547; 1942, § 1708; Laws, 1956, ch. 236, eff. July 1, 1956]

§13-1-49. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 221, ch. 62, art. 93; 1871, § 1086; 1880, §§ 1620, 1948; 1892, § 1758; 1906, § 1935; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1595; 1930, § 1548; 1942, § 1709]

§13-1-51. [Codes, 1857, ch. 62, art. 92; 1871, § 1085; 1880, § 1943; 1892, § 1761; 1906, § 1938; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1598; 1930, § 1551; 1942, § 1712; Laws, 1956, ch. 237, eff. July 1, 1956]

§13-1-53. [Codes, 1880, § 1944; 1892, § 1762; 1906, § 1939; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1599; 1930, § 1549; 1942, § 1710]

§13-1-55. [Codes, 1871, § 1076; 1880, § 1945; 1892, § 1763; 1906, § 1940; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1600; 1930, § 1550; 1942, § 1711; Laws, 1882, p. 111]

§13-1-57. [Codes, 1880, § 1650; 1892, § 1766; 1907, § 1943; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1603; 1930, § 1553; 1942, § 1714]

§13-1-59. [Codes, 1880, § 1651; 1892, § 1767; 1906, § 1944; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1604; 1930, § 1554; 1942, § 1715]

§13-1-61. [Codes, 1880, § 1655; 1892, § 1768; 1906, § 1945; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1605; 1930, § 1555; 1942, § 1716]

§13-1-63. [Codes, 1880, § 1652; 1892, § 1769; 1906, § 1946; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1606; 1930, § 1556; 1942, § 1717]

§13-1-65. [Codes, 1880, § 1660; 1892, § 1770; 1906, § 1947; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1607; 1930, § 1557; 1942, § 1718]

§13-1-67. [Codes, 1880, §§ 1653, 1654; 1892, §§ 1771, 1772; 1906, §§ 1948, 1949; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 1608, 1609; 1930, §§ 1558, 1559; 1942, §§ 1719, 1720]

§13-1-69. [Codes, 1880, § 1656; 1892, § 1773; 1906, § 1950; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1610; 1930, § 1560; 1942, § 1721]

§13-1-71. [Codes, 1880, § 1657; 1892, § 1774; 1906, § 1951; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1611; 1930, § 1561; 1942, § 1722]

§13-1-73. [Codes, 1880, § 1658; 1892, § 1775; 1906, § 1952; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1612; 1930, § 1562; 1942, § 1723]

§13-1-75. [Codes, 1880, § 1659; 1892, § 1776; 1906, § 1953; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1613; 1930, § 1563; 1942, § 1724]

§ 13-1-77.
State custodian of books authorized to certify copies; admissibility of copies.

All public officers in this state having the charge or custody of any public books, records, papers, or writings, are authorized to certify copies of the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 235; 1871, § 814; 1880, § 1632; 1892, § 1791; 1906, § 1968; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1628; 1930, § 1564; 1942, § 1725; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 88, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 13-1-79.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 230; 1871, § 809; 1880, § 1624; 1892, § 1783; 1906, § 1960; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1620; 1930, § 1583; 1942, § 1745]

§ 13-1-81.
Presumptions attending certificates, attestation, etc.

Any certificate, attestation, or authentication, purporting to have been made or given by any person as an officer of any state or of the United States, shall be prima facie evidence of the official character of such person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1629; 1892, § 1796; 1906, § 1973; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1633; 1930, § 1565; 1942, § 1726.

§§ 13-1-83 through 13-1-117.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§13-1-83. [Codes, 1880, § 1628; 1892, § 1795; 1906, § 1972; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1632; 1930, § 1566; 1942, § 1727]

§13-1-85. [Codes, 1942, § 4065.7-04; Laws, 1966, ch. 554, § 4]

§13-1-87. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 307; 1880, § 1787; 1892, § 1788; 1906, § 1965; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1625; 1930, § 1567; 1942, § 1728]

§13-1-89. [Codes, 1880, § 1749; 1892, § 1792; 1906, § 1969; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1629; 1930, § 1568; 1942, § 1729; Laws, 1896, ch. 101]

§13-1-91. [Codes, 1880, § 2211; 1892, § 1780; 1906, § 1957; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1617; 1930, § 1569; 1942, § 1730]

§13-1-93. [Codes, 1857, ch. 8, art. 3; 1880, § 2388; 1892, § 1790; 1906, § 1967; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1627; 1930, § 1570; 1942, § 1731]

§13-1-95. [Codes, 1892, § 1807; 1906, § 1984; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1644; 1930, § 1571; 1942, § 1732]

§13-1-97. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 11 (1); 1857, ch. 61, art. 228; 1871, § 807; 1880, § 1622; 1892, § 1779; 1906, § 1956; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1616; 1930, § 1572; 1942, § 1733; Laws, 1896, chs. 101, 102]

§13-1-99. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 228; 1871, § 807; 1880, § 1622; 1892, § 1778; 1906, § 1955; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1615; 1930, § 1584; 1942, § 1746]

§13-1-101. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 2; 1857, ch. 61, art. 227; 1871, § 806; 1880, § 1621; 1892, § 1777; 1906, § 1954; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1614; 1930, § 1585; 1942, § 1747]

§13-1-103. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 34, art. 1 (7); 1857, ch. 40, art 7; 1871, § 1761; 1880, § 1149; 1892, § 1789; 1906, § 1966; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1626; 1930, § 1573; 1942, § 1734]

§13-1-105. [Codes, 1857, ch. 60, art. 48; 1871, § 1104; 1880, § 1975; 1892, § 1781; 1906, § 1958; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1618; 1930, § 1574; 1942, § 1735]

§13-1-107. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 231; 1871, § 810; 1880, § 1625; 1892, § 1784; 1906, § 1961; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1621; 1930, § 1575; 1942, § 1736]

§13-1-109. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 4 (1); 1857, ch. 61, art. 232; 1871, § 811; 1880, § 1626; 1892, § 1785; 1906, § 1962; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1622; 1930, § 1576; 1942, § 1737]

§13-1-111. [Codes, 1942, § 1749; Laws, 1936, ch. 253]

§13-1-113. [Codes, 1892, § 1786; 1906, § 1963; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1623; 1930, § 1577; 1942, § 1738]

§13-1-114. [En Laws, 1979, ch. 389; Am 1986, ch. 359]

§13-1-115. [Codes, 1871, § 1700; 1880, § 526; 1892, § 1806; 1906, § 1983; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1643; 1930, § 1578; 1942, §§ 1739, 1740]

§13-1-117. [Codes, 1857, ch. 60, art. 131; 1871, § 1189; 1880, § 2091; 1892, § 1787; 1906, § 1964; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1624; 1930, § 1586; 1942, § 1748]

§ 13-1-119.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1989, ch. 465, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

[Codes, 1880, § 1059; 1892, § 1808; 1906, § 1985; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1645; 1930, § 1580; 1942, § 1741; Laws 1912, ch. 215]

§ 13-1-121.
Injury to livestock in transit as prima facie evidence of carrier’s want of skill.

In all actions against common carriers for injury or damage done to livestock while in transit, proof that the injury inflicted or damage done was inflicted or done to the livestock while in transit, shall be prima facie evidence of the want of reasonable skill and care on the part of the common carrier, their agents and employees in handling the shipment of livestock so injured or damaged.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp., § 1647a; 1930, § 1581; 1942, § 1743; Laws, 1920, ch. 241.

§ 13-1-123.
Injury to persons or property from operation of motor vehicle as making out prima facie case.

In any action brought to recover any damages, either to person or property, caused by running or operating a motor vehicle in violation of any of the provisions of Chapters 3 and 5 of Title 63 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, the plaintiff or plaintiffs shall be deemed to have made out a prima facie case by showing the fact of such injury, and that such person or persons operating, or causing to be run or operated, such motor vehicle, was at the time of the injury running or operating, or causing the said motor vehicle to be run or operated in a manner contrary to the provisions of Chapters 3 and 5 of Title 63 of the Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5785; 1930, § 5588; 1942, § 1742; Laws, 1916, ch. 116.

§§ 13-1-124 through 13-1-129.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§13-1-124. [En Laws, 1981, ch. 361, § 1]

§13-1-125. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 233; 1871, § 812; 1880, § 1630; 1892, § 1793; 1906, § 1970; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1630; 1930, § 1593; 1942, § 1756]

§13-1-127. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 234; 1871, § 813; 1880, § 1631; 1892, § 1794; 1906, § 1971; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1631; 1930, § 1594; 1942, § 1757]

§13-1-129. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 9; 1857, ch. 61, art. 240; 1871, § 816; 1880, § 1636; 1892, § 1802; 1906, § 1979; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1639; 1930, § 1592; 1942, § 1755]

§ 13-1-131.
Land-office certificates.

All certificates issued in pursuance of any act of Congress by any board of commissioners, register of any land office, or any other person authorized to issue such certificate, founded on any warrant, order of survey, entry, grant, confirmation, donation, preemption, or purchase from the United States of any land in this state, shall vest the full legal title to such land in the person to whom such certificate is granted, his heirs or assigns, so far as to enable the holder thereof to maintain an action thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 11 (2); 1857, ch. 61, art. 229; 1871, § 808; 1880, § 1623; 1892, § 1782; 1906, § 1959; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1619; 1930, § 1582; 1942, § 1744; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 89, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§§ 13-1-133 through 13-1-147.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§13-1-133. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 238; 1871, § 684; 1880, § 1634; 1892, § 1798; 1906, § 1975; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1635; 1930, § 1588; 1942, § 1751]

§13-1-135. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 239; 1871, § 685; 1880, § 1635; 1892, § 1799; 1906, § 1976; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1636; 1930, § 1589; 1942, § 1752]

§13-1-137. [Codes, 1892, § 1800; 1906, § 1977; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1637; 1930, § 1590; 1942, § 1753]

§13-1-139. [Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 237; 1871, § 683; 1880, § 1633; 1892, § 1797; 1906, § 1974, § 1974; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1634; 1930, § 1587; 1942, § 1750]

§13-1-141. [Codes, 1871, § 782; 1880, § 1627; 1892, § 1801; 1906, § 1978; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1638; 1930, § 1591; 1942, § 1754]

§13-1-143. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 7; 1857, ch. 61, art. 241; 1871, § 819; 1880, § 1637; 1892, § 1803; 1906, § 1980; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1640; 1930, § 1595; 1942, § 1758]

§13-1-145. [Codes, 1880, § 1639; 1892, § 1804; 1906, § 1981; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1641; 1930, § 1596; 1942, § 1759]

§13-1-147. [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 61, art. 1 (79); 1857, ch. 61, art. 224; 1871, § 688; 1880, § 2297; 1892, § 1809; 1906, § 1986; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1646; 1930, § 1597; 1942, § 1760]

§ 13-1-149.
Courts to take notice of law of United States, other states, territories and foreign countries.

When any question shall arise as to the law of the United States, or of any other state or territory of the United States, or of the District of Columbia, or of any foreign country, the court shall take notice of such law in the same manner as if the question arose under the law of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 60, art. 10; 1857, ch. 61, art. 226; 1871, § 805; 1880, § 2296; 1892, § 939; 1906, § 1015; Hemingway’s 1917, § 735; 1930, § 1598; 1942, § 1761.

§ 13-1-151.
Reproduction of business records; disposal of originals.

Any business may cause any or all records kept by such business in the regular course of its operation to be recorded, copied or reproduced by any photographic, photostatic or miniature photographic process which correctly, accurately and permanently copies, reproduces or forms a medium for copying or reproducing the original record on a film or other durable material, and such business may thereafter dispose of the original record, provided that every original record pertaining to any claim, tax or report due the State of Mississippi or any of its agencies shall be preserved for five (5) years from the thirty-first day of December of the year in which such claim arose, or such tax or report was due.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1761.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 488, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 90, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 13-1-153.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[Codes, 1942, § 1761.7; Laws, 1966, ch. 525, § 1]

§ 13-1-155.
Destruction or other disposal of exhibits following final determination of civil actions.

After not less than ninety (90) days after the final determination or disposition of any civil action, or if an appeal shall have been taken, then after not less than ninety (90) days after receiving a certificate of the final disposition of the action, the clerk of the court in which the action was filed or tried shall destroy, return or otherwise dispose of all exhibits which were filed in the action. Provided, however, that no exhibit shall be destroyed, returned or otherwise disposed of until after the expiration of the time within which a bill of review may be filed in applicable cases as provided in Section 11-5-121, Mississippi Code of 1972. The clerk shall notify the attorneys for all parties to the action and the owner or person having custody of the property prior to the court action before the expiration of the ninety (90) day period that the exhibits may be claimed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 344, eff from and after passage (approved April 14, 1976).